Louisiana, session 2026, HB243.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 682 is hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
Art. 682. Appointment of substitute for a recused district attorney
When a district attorney is recused, or recuses himself, the trial judge shall
either appoint an attorney at law, who has the qualifications of a district attorney and
is not an assistant to the recused district attorney, to act in the place of the district
attorney in the case, or shall notify the attorney general in writing of the recusation.
In the latter instance, it It shall be the duty of the attorney general to appoint a
member of his staff or a district attorney of another district to act in the place of the
recused district attorney. The substitute appointed for the recused district attorney
shall have all powers of the recused district attorney with reference to the case.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.